lib/dict/lt.aff
SFX E Y 165
SFX E a       u               a
SFX E a       i               [^i]a
SFX E a       0               [^èþ]ia
SFX E èia     ti              èia
SFX E þia     i               dþia
SFX E 0       me              a
SFX E 0       m               a
SFX E 0       te              a
SFX E 0       t               a
SFX E 0       u               [^dt]i
SFX E i       þiu             di
SFX E ti      èiu             ti
SFX E 0       me              [aio]
SFX E 0       m               [aio]
SFX E 0       te              [aio]
SFX E 0       t               [aio]
SFX E o       au              o
SFX E o       ai              o
SFX E 0       me              o
SFX E 0       m               o
SFX E 0       te              o
SFX E 0       t               o
SFX E 0       nt              [ai]
SFX E o       ant             o
SFX E 0       ntis            [ai]
SFX E a       às              a
SFX E i       ás              i
SFX E 0       nèio            [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiam           [ai]
SFX E 0       ntá             [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiu            [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiame          [ai]
SFX E o       antis           o
SFX E o       às              o
SFX E o       anèio           o
SFX E o       anèiam          o
SFX E o       antá            o
SFX E o       anèiu           o
SFX E o       anèiame         o
SFX E 0       nti             [ai]
SFX E 0       nèios           [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiai           [ai]
SFX E 0       nèià            [ai]
SFX E 0       nèia            [ai]
SFX E 0       nèioje          [ai]
SFX E 0       nèioj           [ai]
SFX E o       anti            o
SFX E o       anèios          o
SFX E o       anèiai          o
SFX E o       anèià           o
SFX E o       anèia           o
SFX E o       anèioje         o
SFX E o       anèioj          o
SFX E 0       ntys            [ai]
SFX E a       à               a
SFX E i       á               i
SFX E 0       nèiø            [ai]
SFX E 0       ntiems          [ai]
SFX E 0       nèius           [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiais          [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiuose         [ai]
SFX E o       antys           o
SFX E o       à               o
SFX E o       anèiø           o
SFX E o       antiems         o
SFX E o       anèius          o
SFX E o       anèiais         o
SFX E o       anèiuose        o
SFX E 0       nèioms          [ai]
SFX E 0       nèias           [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiomis         [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiose          [ai]
SFX E o       anèioms         o
SFX E o       anèias          o
SFX E o       anèiomis        o
SFX E o       anèiose         o
SFX E 0       ntysis          [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiojo          [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiajam         [ai]
SFX E 0       ntájá           [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiuoju         [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiajame        [ai]
SFX E o       antysis         o
SFX E o       anèiojo         o
SFX E o       anèiajam        o
SFX E o       antájá          o
SFX E o       anèiuoju        o
SFX E o       anèiajame       o
SFX E 0       nèioji          [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiosios        [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiajai         [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiàjà          [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiàja          [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiojoje        [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiojoj         [ai]
SFX E o       anèioji         o
SFX E o       anèiosios       o
SFX E o       anèiajai        o
SFX E o       anèiàjà         o
SFX E o       anèiàja         o
SFX E o       anèiojoje       o
SFX E o       anèiojoj        o
SFX E 0       ntieji          [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiøjø          [ai]
SFX E 0       ntiesiems       [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiuosius       [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiaisiais      [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiuosiuose     [ai]
SFX E o       antieji         o
SFX E o       anèiøjø         o
SFX E o       antiesiems      o
SFX E o       anèiuosius      o
SFX E o       anèiaisiais     o
SFX E o       anèiuosiuose    o
SFX E 0       nèiosioms       [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiàsias        [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiosiomis      [ai]
SFX E 0       nèiosiose       [ai]
SFX E o       anèiosioms      o
SFX E o       anèiàsias       o
SFX E o       anèiosiomis     o
SFX E o       anèiosiose      o
SFX E 0       mas             [aio]
SFX E 0       mo              [aio]
SFX E 0       mam             [aio]
SFX E 0       mà              [aio]
SFX E 0       mu              [aio]
SFX E 0       mame            [aio]
SFX E 0       ma              [aio]
SFX E 0       mos             [aio]
SFX E 0       mai             [aio]
SFX E 0       moje            [aio]
SFX E 0       moj             [aio]
SFX E 0       mi              [aio]
SFX E 0       mø              [aio]
SFX E 0       miems           [aio]
SFX E 0       mus             [aio]
SFX E 0       mais            [aio]
SFX E 0       muose           [aio]
SFX E 0       moms            [aio]
SFX E 0       momis           [aio]
SFX E 0       mose            [aio]
SFX E 0       masis           [aio]
SFX E 0       mojo            [aio]
SFX E 0       majam           [aio]
SFX E 0       màjá            [aio]
SFX E 0       muoju           [aio]
SFX E 0       majame          [aio]
SFX E 0       moji            [aio]
SFX E 0       mosios          [aio]
SFX E 0       majai           [aio]
SFX E 0       màjà            [aio]
SFX E 0       màja            [aio]
SFX E 0       mojoje          [aio]
SFX E 0       mojoj           [aio]
SFX E 0       mieji           [aio]
SFX E 0       møjø            [aio]
SFX E 0       miesiems        [aio]
SFX E 0       muosius         [aio]
SFX E 0       maisiais        [aio]
SFX E 0       muosiuose       [aio]
SFX E 0       mosioms         [aio]
SFX E 0       màsias          [aio]
SFX E 0       mosiomis        [aio]
SFX E 0       mosiose         [aio]
