lib/dict/lt.dic
şabuoja/ENX
şagaruoja/ENX
şaidşia/ENSXcefhiknovwx
aistrina/ENRSXacko
aklinëja/ENXd
akuoja/ENXblv
alkina/ENXdj
şalsvëja/ENXf
amèioja/ENX
anèiauja/ENX
apğampa/ENX
apyniauja/ENXd
apskritëja/ENXk
şarglioja/ENX
şaruoja/ENXk
atestuoja/ENX
atsigosta/ENX
augina/ENRSXabcdfhjklnoptvx
aukğtëja/ENX
avieèiauja/ENX
bailëja/ENX
balnoja/ENRSXefhlqrtx
bambsi/ENX
barğka/ENXbcdekl
baubia/ENXgkl
bûdrauja/ENX
beproèiauja/ENX
şëbia/ENX
bintuoja/ENRXam
bitininkauja/ENRSXdfinqrtv
blağko/ENRSXdepqruw
bliûğkina/ENX
blykèioja/ENXk
blásta/ENXdjk
boluoja/ENXk
brakğtelëja/ENX
breiğkia/ENX
brëkğtelëja/ENX
bruktelëja/ENX
bubsi/ENX
bunka/ENXbejl
burzga/ENXk
capinëja/ERSX
cieksi/ENX
cirpina/ENX
cvangtelëja/ENX
dailina/ENRSXacdefhklmnpqrtvw
dantija/ENRXcdfp
daubia/ENXd
dëbtelëja/ENX
dega/ENRXacdefhijklopvx
dekoduoja/ESXfv
denatûruoja/ENX
destiliuoja/ENX
dşiausto/ENRXadefjkpw
dilbakiuoja/ENX
ëdina/ENX
dirbina/ENX
disciplinuoja/ENX
dygsi/ENX
dyrinëja/ENX
dûluoja/ENXk
dorovina/ENX
drambloja/ENXd
dresiruoja/ENXd
dribsi/ENX
drioksi/ENX
dryska/ENXabcdefikouvwx
drûsta/ENX
druskuoja/ENRSXk
dujëja/ENX
dumbluoja/ENRSXdkpw
duobëja/ENRXdp
dvazga/ENX
dvilktelëja/ENX
dzagnoja/ENX
èeşa/ENXk
eiguliauja/ENX
eksperimentuoja/ENXfv
şelëja/ENX
engia/ENXdeq
şergloja/ENX
erzeliuoja/ENXfk
fermentuoja/ERSX
fuchteliuoja/ENX
gailauja/ENXab
galabina/ENRXdep
gangrenuoja/ENX
gargaliuoja/ENXfjk
gaubsto/ENRXl
gëdina/ENXdk
gelsvina/ENXf
gerbia/ENRXafm
giedrina/ENRSXdpqu
giminina/ENX
girgşdena/ENX
gişta/ENXafik
gyvina/ENXf
glaudo/ENRX
gliaudo/ENRXdfjv
glodina/ENXl
gnaibioja/ERSX
gobsto/ENRXa
graboja/ENX
gramzdina/ENXce
grûda/ENRSXbcdefhjklnopqstuvwx
griaudşia/ENRXdefkl
grikğtelëja/ENX
griozdina/ENRXacefjklm
gràşo/ENRXjk
gruma/ENXk
gàsèioja/ENRX
gugina/ENRSX
gumğuoja/ENX
gurgşda/ENX
gverina/ENXd
èiaudi/ENXklq
şiauktelëja/ENX
şibina/ENRXcdfklrx
identifikuoja/ENRSX
ignoruoja/ENXfk
èiûkğtelëja/ENX
şilpina/ENX
iğmirioja/ENX
indukuoja/ENX
inkğèioja/ENX
internacionalizuoja/ENSX
ûşèioja/ENX
ğiûpèioja/ENX
şirglinëja/ENX
ğirmëja/ENX
ğiûruoja/ENXe
èiuşa/ENXk
èiuknoja/ENX
ğiumpa/ENX
èiurina/ENRXacdmop
ğiurpina/ENRXk
şybsena/ENX
ğykğti/ENXf
şysta/ENXeik
jaunëja/ENXbf
judrina/ENX
juokina/ENXcij
kabaruoja/ENRXo
kaiğo/ENRXadefjklmpr
kakğnoja/ENX
kalkëja/ENXkl
kamğtëja/ENXk
kanonizuoja/ENX
karglioja/ENXl
karnauja/ENX
karuliuoja/ENX
kauburiuoja/ENX
kaulëja/ENXk
kebelioja/ERSX
kekëja/ENX
kepaluoja/ENX
kerğija/ENRXbn
kesnoja/ENX
kiaukso/ENX
kieminëja/ENXx
kilstelëja/ENX
kinkuoja/ENXf
kirdina/ERSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
kirpinëja/ENX
kiûturiuoja/ENX
kyburiuoja/ENX
klaba/ENX
klampojo/ENOPSXbcdefghjk
klebetuoja/ENX
klejoja/ENX
klerina/ENXd
klibinkğtuoja/ENX
klimğtelëja/ENX
kliuktelëja/ENX
klykèioja/ENX
klojëja/ENRXdfknptw
klumpinëja/ENX
knaibo/ENXbdf
knëbtelëja/ENX
kniauktelëja/ENX
kniûpso/ENX
knybura/ENX
koketuoja/ENX
kompostuoja/ENX
konsoliduoja/ERSX
koordinuoja/ENRSXfkrtw
kosëja/ENXbdfklnpqx
kraièioja/ENXd
krankèioja/ENX
krato/ENRSXabcdefhjklnpqruvwx
kreivezoja/ENX
krenksi/ENX
krienija/ENX
kriokia/ENXkl
kryşiuoja/ENRSXbehknqtw
kryvuoja/ENX
kruğa/ENRSXabcdefhijklmnopqrstuvwx
kàsniuoja/ENXk
kuisnoja/ENX
kulkğniuoja/ENX
kumsi/ENX
kupa/ENX
kurpiauja/ENX
kvaiğina/ENXa
kvaknoja/ENX
kvarkèioja/ENX
kviesliauja/ENX
kvëkğèioja/ENX
labina/ENRSXfrv
lağiniauja/ENX
lakatuoja/ENX
ğlamğèia/ENXk
lankstinëja/ENX
laso/ENRXdjkw
ğlavinëja/ENRXbekw
legalizuoja/ENRSX
lekuoja/ENX
lenkina/ENXk
şleptelëja/ENX
şlûgso/ENX
şlibinëja/ENX
lietinëja/ENX
limsta/ENXef
linksta/ENXbcdefhjkl
liştelëja/ENX
ğliukğtelëja/ENX
liurbina/ENX
lygiuoja/ENRSXdfkpw
ğlyvina/ENX
lodo/ENXk
ğlubikğèiuoja/ENX
ğluoja/ENRSXacdefhijklmnpqrtuvwx
maiğininkauja/ENX
mağinuoja/ENXd
makoja/ENRXdjkpvw
malğta/ENX
marèiauja/ENX
maskatuoja/ENXdfk
maukğlina/ENRXalmx
mûdrauja/ENX
meistrauja/ENXl
menkëja/ENXek
mëgina/ENRSXdfrv
migdo/ENRXfkl
ğmikğtelëja/ENX
minkğtëja/ENXfk
ğmirkğèia/ERSX
mygtelëja/ENX
ğmëklinëja/ENX
mëlsta/ENXfl
mokytojauja/ENX
mostaguoja/ENXfk
mûsoja/ENXa
mulèiuoja/ENX
ğmurkğtelëja/ENX
mûvi/ENX
nakvina/ENXah
narna/ENX
nebeina/E
ğnekinëja/ENX
nesa/E
ğnibşda/ENRSXfkrw
ğniokğèia/ENRSXabdefijklmnopqtx
ğnirpğèioja/ENX
niurdo/ENX
nykğèiuoja/ENX
noksta/ENXadefhijk
nubrauko/ENX
nuodija/ENRSXadejlmpqx
nuskambsta/ENX
ğokinëja/ENRXabcdefghijklnpruvx
oponuoja/ENX
pabaista/ENX
pagailsta/ENX
paikëja/ENXk
pajamuoja/ENXl
pakûli/ENX
palypi/ENX
pampa/ENX
pağoki/ENX
paragrafuoja/ENX
partizanauja/ENX
pasimaivo/ENX
paskrydëja/ENX
pasviedi/ENX
pauğkina/ENXk
pavyji/ENX
pelenguoja/ENX
perbûva/ENX
perğti/ENXfko
piketuoja/ENX
pilkina/ENX
pinklioja/ENRXdklpw
pykdo/ENXcfjkl
pyplinëja/ENX
pûkğto/ENXe
platina/ENRSXdefipru
pleiğëja/ENXk
plerina/ENXd
pliauğkina/ENXfk
pliktelëja/ENX
pliuğka/ENXk
pliupina/ENX
plyğoja/ENXf
plokğtëja/ENXk
plumpuoja/ENX
poğkina/ENXk
populiarëja/ENXd
prabyla/ENX
prapuldo/ENX
preparuoja/ENX
prieğtarauja/ENXf
prislëgia/ENX
protezuoja/ENX
pëslinëja/ENX
puşinëja/ENX
pumpuoja/ENXdhj
purëja/ENXd
pursta/ENXdfk
pûva/ENXacdefhik
raiğina/ENX
raiğuoja/ENX
ramina/ENRSXaefjkmq
rarina/ENX
raugèioja/ENX
raustelëja/ENX
reformuoja/ENX
rektifikuoja/ENX
repeèkena/ENXx
revanğuoja/ERSX
rûgğtelëja/ENX
riğdina/ENX
rikiuoja/ENRSXdfhjkptvw
riogso/ENX
rydo/ENXjk
rëkdo/ENRX
ropğèia/ENRSXnopqsvx
rudina/ENXck
ruoğia/ENRSXacdfjkmoprvw
rusvuoja/ENX
saikuoja/ENX
salsta/ENX
santykiuoja/ENX
sauvaliauja/ENX
segdina/ENX
sekretoriauja/ENX
senstelëja/ENX
siautëja/ENXo
sieksniuoja/ENX
silpnëja/ENXek
ásispitrëja/ENX
siutina/ENXcl
skainioja/ENRXadfjr
skambaliuoja/ENX
skardi/ENXek
skelbèioja/ENX
skersuoja/ENRXbfk
skirsta/ENXk
sklambo/ENX
skramba/ENX
skuodşia/ENXabdegi
slûgso/ENX
slugdo/ENXek
smeigia/ENRXcefhjkloqrtv
smuikuoja/ENX
snûsta/ENXaejkl
spauduoja/ENRXcko
spirituoja/ENX
sprûdinëja/ENX
spurina/ENX
şûsta/ENXi
stebi/ENOSXfnoqv
stirkso/ENXf
storëja/ENXfk
striuokèioja/ENX
suburşuazëja/ENX
suktelëja/ENX
supastovëja/ENX
susverdi/ENX
sveikëja/ENX
svoèiauja/ENX
talkininkauja/ENXf
taranduoja/ENX
taupo/ENRXfjkrvw
tekğtelëja/ENX
terlija/ERSX
tilşta/ENXf
tirpèioja/ENX
tûno/ENXdfi
traksi/ENX
trauktelëja/ENX
triauğëja/ENX
tripnoja/ENX
trûkteli/ENX
táslina/ENX
turlena/ENRX
tvarko/ENRSXaefhkmqrtuvw
tvylinëja/ENX
uşkruopğèia/ENX
uşpildinëja/ENX
utinëja/ENX
vaidilauja/ENX
vaitoja/ENXabdfghijklorv
valyvëja/ENX
ğvankğèia/ENRSXk
ğvarkğèia/ERSX
vatuoja/ENX
veikinëja/ENX
vemia/ENRXadjkmpqw
verpdina/ENX
ğvieşëja/ENX
vilbina/ENXd
vëşina/ENRXf
virğija/ENXh
virtuliuoja/ENXg
vyğniauja/ENX
vëşlina/ENXegk
vëpso/ENX
zirbauja/ENX
zurpso/ENX
